Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1097.
do enact as follows:AB1097,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1097,27Section 2. 20.445 (1) (fb) of the statutes is created to read:AB1097,2,10820.445 (1) (fb) Local fair housing grant program. As a continuing 9appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the local fair housing grant program 10under s. 106.50 (9).AB1097,311Section 3. 66.1012 of the statutes is created to read:AB1097,2,131266.1012 Local fair housing departments. (1) Definitions. In this 13section:AB1097,2,1414(a) “Discriminate” has the meaning given in s. 106.50 (1m) (h).AB1097,2,1515(b) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB1097,2,1816(2) Local fair housing departments. A political subdivision may create a 17new department or designate an existing department to perform all of the following 18functions as a fair housing department:AB1097,3,219(a) Provide outreach and public education about the rights of individuals and 1families regarding discrimination in housing under local ordinances and state and 2federal laws.AB1097,3,53(b) Assist residents of the political subdivision to understand how to file 4complaints about violations of the rights of individuals and families under state and 5federal law and local ordinances regarding discrimination in housing.AB1097,3,66(c) Enforce local ordinances regarding discrimination in housing.AB1097,47Section 4. 106.50 (9) of the statutes is created to read:AB1097,3,118106.50 (9) Local fair housing grant pilot program. (a) From the 9appropriation under s. 20.445 (1) (fb) the department may award grants to a 10political subdivision to create or designate a local fair housing department under s. 1166.1012. AB1097,3,1312(b) A grant application under this subsection shall include a plan for the 13creation or designation of a local fair housing department under s. 66.1012.AB1097,3,1614(c) The department may not award a grant under this subsection to a political 15subdivision if the political subdivision is included in the jurisdiction of a local fair 16housing department that has previously received a grant under this subsection.AB1097,3,2017(d) The department shall divide the state into regions based on the regions 18established under s. 234.66 (4) (f). Of the total amount awarded in grants under 19this subsection, no region may receive more than 12.5 percent of those moneys in 20grants awarded under this subsection.AB1097,3,2321(e) A political subdivision that receives a grant under this subsection may use 22the grant moneys only to directly support the creation or designation of a local fair 23housing department under s. 66.1012.AB1097,4,11(f) No grants may be awarded under this subsection after June 30, 2029.AB1097,4,22